Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 2. State Revolving Account

§ 16-1-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Account” means the state water pollution control revolving loan account created by W.S.

16-1-202

;

“Board” means the state loan and investment board;

“Capitalization grant” means the federal grant made to Wyoming by the federal environmental protection agency for the purpose of establishing a state water pollution control revolving loan account;

“Corrective action” means as defined by W.S. 35-11-1415(a)(i);

“Corrective action account” means as defined by W.S. 35-11-1415(a)(ii);

“Department” means the department of environmental quality;

“Nonpoint source” means any source of pollution other than a point source as defined by W.S. 35-11-103(a)(x) and includes leaking underground storage tanks and aboveground storage tanks;

“Title VI” means Title VI of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. §§ 1381 to 1387 as amended;

“Underground storage tank” means as defined by W.S. 35-11-1415(a)(ix);

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Aboveground storage tank” means as defined by W.S. 35-11-1415(a)(xi).

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 64, § 1; 1994, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(x), which read: “ ‘This article’ means W.S.

16-1-201

through

16-1-207

.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “as amended” for “(Cum. Supp. 1989)” in (a)(viii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-1-202.
Account established; state match.

There is established the state water pollution control revolving loan account. All monies received from federal capitalization grants, excluding any set-aside authorized by Title VI, and all state matching funds shall be deposited in the account and shall be used only to provide financial assistance as authorized in this article.

The twenty percent (20%) state matching funds for each federal capitalization grant payment to the account shall be paid from the corrective action account. If the available funds from the corrective action account are insufficient to provide the full twenty percent (20%) state match amount, the board may authorize additional match funding to be paid from the mineral royalty capital construction account created by W.S.

9-4-604

. Funding received from the corrective action account and the mineral royalty capital construction account for state matching funds shall be reimbursed from eligible program funds to the account from which they were paid.

Payments of principal and interest on all financial assistance made under this article shall be deposited in the account. All funds in the account may be used for and are continuously appropriated for financial assistance as authorized in this article.

Any unexpended balance in the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and the interest earned shall be credited to the account.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 64, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2022 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “, excluding any set-aside authorized by Title VI,” in (a); and added the second and third sentences in (b).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 16-1-203.
Account administration; board powers and duties; department powers and duties; fiscal procedures.

The board shall administer the account including issuing loans and other forms of financial assistance for the purposes authorized in this article. The board shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary to administer the account within the requirements of this article, Title VI and other federal laws.

The board shall:

Enter an agreement with the federal environmental protection agency regional administrator to receive capitalization grants for the account;

Receive and review applications for financial assistance from the account from municipalities, counties, joint powers boards, state agencies and other entities constituting a political subdivision under the laws of the state on forms supplied by the board;

Administer the account including processing and receiving repayments on all financial assistance; and

Conduct or allow the federal environmental protection agency to conduct an annual audit.

The department shall:

Annually prepare and submit to the federal environmental protection agency and the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee of the legislature an intended use plan which has been subject to public comment and which identifies the intended uses of monies available to the account;

Prepare and submit an annual report required by Title VI; and

Evaluate engineering designs and studies and evaluate technical and administrative management of contracts for all projects in accordance with Title VI.

The board and all recipients of financial assistance from the account shall establish fiscal controls and accounting procedures required by Title VI.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 64, § 1; 2005, ch. 151, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b)(ii), inserted “and other entities constituting a political subdivision under the laws of the state,” and made a related stylistic change.

Meaning of “Title VI.” —

For the definition of “Title VI,” referred to in this section, see § 16-1-201(a)(viii).

§ 16-1-204.
Environmental review process.

Through the department the board shall conduct a review of potential environmental impacts of projects receiving assistance from the account. The environmental review process shall:

Contain mechanisms requiring implementation of mitigation measures to ensure the project is environmentally sound;

Allow the public an opportunity to challenge environmental review determinations and enforcement actions;

Include documentation of information, processes and premises that influence decisions;

Require public notice and participation;

Include evaluation criteria and processes allowing consideration of alternative decisions; and

Comply with the requirements of Title VI and significant issues pertaining to underground storage tanks as specified in Subtitle I of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. § 6991 et seq.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 64, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the 1990 printed act.

Meaning of “Title VI.” —

For the definition of “Title VI,” referred to in subsection (a)(vi), see § 16-1-201(a)(viii).

§ 16-1-205.
Authorized projects; authorized financial assistance.

The account may be used for financial assistance for the following types of projects:

Construction of wastewater treatment works as allowed by Title VI;

Implementation of nonpoint source pollution control management programs as allowed by Title VI;

Other projects as allowed by Title VI.

Financial assistance for the projects authorized in subsection (a) of this section may take the forms provided in Title VI including:

Loans at or below market interest rates or for zero interest. Loans may be awarded only if:

All principal and interest payments on loans are credited directly to the account;

The annual repayment of principal and payment of interest begins not later than one (1) year after project completion;

The loan is fully amortized not later than the useful life of the project or thirty (30) years after project completion, whichever is less; and

Each loan recipient establishes a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of the loan.

Refinancing existing debt obligations of municipalities, counties, joint powers boards and state agencies for wastewater treatment works for which debt was incurred and building began after March 7, 1985;

Purchasing insurance for or guaranteeing local debt obligations to improve credit market access or reduce interest rates;

Security or a source of revenue for the payment of principal and interest on revenue or general obligation bonds issued by the state provided that the net proceeds of the sale of such bonds shall be deposited in the account;

Loan guarantees for similar revolving accounts established by municipalities, counties or joint powers boards; and

Grants and other forms of financial assistance.

Each fiscal year, an amount of up to four percent (4%) of the capitalization grant, four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000.00) or two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) of the current valuation of the account, which ever amount is greatest, may be used for costs of administering the account. The monies and fees provided by subsection (d) of this section, used to administer the account are not forms of financial assistance which are prioritized under W.S.

16-1-206

.

The board, as a condition to making a loan or other financial assistance, may impose a reasonable administrative fee or application fee not to exceed one percent (1%) of the loan amount, that may be paid from the proceeds of the loan or financial assistance or other available funds of the applicant. These fees shall be deposited into the account for purposes of payment of administrative costs of the program.

The board may authorize the use of any amount of the allowable percentage of the capitalization grant for any set-aside authorized by Title VI.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 64, § 1; 2016 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added (a)(iii); in (b)(i)(C), substituted “the useful life of the project or thirty (30)” for “twenty (20)” and added “whichever is less” following “completion”; rewrote (c) which read as, “An amount of up to four percent (4%) of the capitalization grant may be used for costs of administering the account.
The monies used to administer the account are not forms of financial assistance which are prioritized under
W.S.

16-1-206

”; and added (d).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (b)(vi); added (e); and made related changes.

Meaning of “Title VI.” —

For the definition of “Title VI,” referred to in this section, see § 16-1-201(a)(viii).

§ 16-1-206.
Financial assistance priorities.

If there are publicly owned wastewater treatment works identified as not being in compliance with the federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., then the monies in the account shall initially be used for such wastewater treatment works.

If there are no publicly owned wastewater treatment works identified as not being in compliance with the Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., then the monies in the account shall initially be used for noninterest bearing loans to the department for taking corrective actions at leaking underground and aboveground storage tank sites, orphan site remediation and solid waste landfill remediation as provided by W.S.

35-11-1424

.

Principal payments to the account from loans made for corrective actions at leaking underground and aboveground storage tank sites, orphan site remediation and remediation at solid waste landfills may be used for any purposes authorized in this article.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 64, § 1; 1994, ch. 32, § 1; 2015 ch. 46, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), added “and solid waste landfill remediation as provided by W.S.

35-11-1424

”; and in (c), inserted “and remediation at solid waste landfills.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “storage tank sites, orphan site remediation and solid” for “storage tank sites and solid”; and in (c), substituted “storage tank sites, orphan site remediation and remediation” for “storage tank sites and remediation.”

§ 16-1-207.
Department loans; repayment.

Principal payments on loans made to the department for taking corrective actions at leaking underground and aboveground storage tank and solid waste landfill remediation sites shall be paid from the corrective action account directly to the state water pollution control revolving loan account.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 64, § 1; 1994, ch. 32, § 1; 2016 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added “and solid waste landfill remediation” following “aboveground storage tank.”